Tennessee, session 114, HB2253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-190, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(2)(G) and substituting:
(G) A threat of mass violence, as defined in § 39-16-517 or § 39-13-813; or
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by deleting
subdivision (j)(1)(G) and substituting:
(G) A threat of mass violence, as defined in § 39-16-517 or § 39-13-813; or
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1316, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(1)(A)(v)(g) and substituting:
(g) A threat of mass violence, as defined in § 39-16-517 or § 39-13-813; or
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351, is amended by deleting
subdivision (c)(19)(G) and substituting:
(G) A threat of mass violence, as defined in § 39-16-517 or § 39-13-813; or
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1352, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(11)(G) and substituting:
(G) A threat of mass violence, as defined in § 39-16-517 or § 39-13-813; or
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1316(a)(1)(A), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(vi) Are ineligible to possess a firearm pursuant to any court order or under any
law of this state.
HB2253
012556
- 1 -

SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1003, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting:
(d) A violation of this section is a Class C felony; however, if the number of
individual images, materials, or combination of images and materials, that are
possessed is more than fifty (50), then the offense is a Class B felony. If the number of
images, materials, or combination of images and materials, exceeds one hundred (100),
then the offense is a Class A felony.
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1004, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(4) and substituting:
(4) A violation of this section is a Class B felony; however, if the number of
individual images, materials, or combination of images and materials that are promoted,
sold, distributed, transported, purchased, exchanged, or possessed, with intent to
promote, sell, distribute, transport, purchase, or exchange, is more than twenty-five (25),
then the offense is a Class A felony.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1004, is amended by deleting
subdivision (b)(4) and substituting:
(4) A violation of this section is a Class B felony; however, if the number of
individual images, materials, or combination of images and materials, that are promoted,
sold, distributed, transported, purchased, exchanged, or possessed, with intent to
promote, sell, distribute, transport, purchase, or exchange, is more than twenty-five (25),
then the offense is a Class A felony.
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1005(d), is amended by
deleting "Class B felony" and substituting "Class A felony".
SECTION 11. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012556